Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 352 Mining Regulations
352.280.
Examination of mine by properly certified person — Duties — Frequency of examinations.

In all mines the licensee, mine manager, or superintendent shall employ one (1) or more properly certified persons.

A properly certified person shall examine carefully, within three (3) hours before each shift enters the mine:

Every working place;

All places adjacent to live workings;

Every roadway where persons are required to work or travel;

All abandoned panels on the intake;

Every set of seals on the intake; and

All roof falls near active workings on the intake and on the working sections.

Before proceeding with the examination he shall see that the air current is traveling its proper course.

A properly certified person shall use approved gas detection devices in the performance of the required examination and shall examine the entrances to all worked-out and abandoned portions adjacent to the intake roadways and working places under his charge where explosive gas is likely to accumulate.

After examination, the properly certified person shall leave at or as close as possible to the face of every place examined the date and time of the examination and his initials as evidence that he has performed his duty.

If an explosive mixture of gas is discovered, the properly certified person shall place a danger signal across the entrance to every place where explosive gas is discovered or where immediate danger is found to exist from any other cause. The signal shall be sufficient warning to ensure that persons do not enter the area.

When the mine is idle and workmen are required to go into the mine, the section, portion, or part of the mine entered must be inspected by a properly certified person within three (3) hours before the workmen enter.

Each week, a properly certified person designated by the mine foreman shall examine each set of seals on the return, all designated intake and return entries, and all escapeways.

History.

2739-38: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 8; 1952, ch. 162, § 30; 1972, ch. 303, § 26; 1976, ch. 174, § 16; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 27; 1996, ch. 308, § 38, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 18, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 20, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.290.
Record book to be kept by fire boss — Report of danger — Accessibility of records to mine inspector and miner.

A suitable record book shall be kept at the mine office of every mine wherein fire bosses are employed, and immediately after the examination of the mine or any portion thereof, by a fire boss, he shall enter and sign a record of the examination in the book with ink. The record shall clearly show the time taken in making the examination, the nature and location of any danger discovered in the mine, and what has been done to correct dangerous conditions. If any danger is discovered, the fire boss shall immediately report its location to the mine foreman, or in his absence to the assistant mine foreman in charge, who shall take immediate action to remove the danger. When a station is located inside a mine the fire boss shall enter and sign a report both in the record book kept there and in a record book in the mine office on the surface. The record books of the licensee shall at all times during working hours be accessible to the mine inspector and the miner or his representative.

History.

2739-38: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 9; 1972, ch. 303, § 27; 1976, ch. 174, § 17; 1996, ch. 308, § 39, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 21, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.300.
Stations for fire bosses — Persons not to pass or remove danger signals.

The mine foreman and the fire boss shall, at or near the main entrance to the mine, provide a permanent station with a proper danger signal, designated by suitable letters and colors placed thereon, and, if the working portions are one (1) mile or more from the entrance to the mine or from the bottom of the shaft or slope, a station of suitable dimensions for the use of the fire boss may be erected by the mine foreman in a location approved by the inspector.

No person, except the mine foreman, and in case of necessity other persons as are designated by him, and under his direct supervision for the purpose of correcting the dangerous condition, shall pass a danger signal until the dangerous condition has been corrected. No person shall enter a mine until the mine has been examined by a fire boss and the mine or the portions of it beyond the fire boss station reported by him to be safe.

The fire boss shall not allow any other person to enter or remain in any portion of the mine through which a dangerous accumulation of gas is being passed into the ventilating current from any portion of the mine. He shall report to the mine foreman at once any violations of KRS

352.280

to

352.310

.

No person except a mine foreman, assistant mine foreman, fire boss or person designated by the mine foreman under subsection (2) of this section, shall pass or remove any danger signal before the mine has been examined and reported to be safe.

No person shall pass or remove any danger signal without permission from the mine foreman, the assistant mine foreman, or the fire boss.

If any mine foreman has knowledge of a violation of subsection (4) or (5) of this section, he shall immediately notify the licensee or superintendent who shall notify the mine inspector, in writing. The mine inspector shall then immediately institute proceedings against the offender.

History.

2739-38: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 28; 1996, ch. 308, § 40, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.310.
Suspension of fire boss — Revocation of certificate.

Any fire boss who fails to perform his duties, or who makes a false report of the condition of any place in the portion of the mine allotted to him for examination, shall be suspended by the mine foreman, and his name shall be given to the mine inspector for prosecution. If he is found guilty by the Mine Safety Review Commission, he shall return his certificate of qualification to the department.

HISTORY:

2739-38: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 29; 2000, ch. 104, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 117, § 42, effective June 29, 2017.

352.320.
Mine foreman — Assistants.

All commercial coal mines shall employ a certified mine foreman therein to properly carry out the plans and rules when approved by the commissioner of the department and to be responsible for compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter.

When the mine workings become so extensive that the mine foreman is unable personally to carry out the duties required of him by law, the operator, superintendent, or mine manager shall employ a sufficient number of persons holding suitable certificates of qualifications to act as assistants to the mine foreman, and under his instructions.

History.

2739-1, 2739-42: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 31; 1972, ch. 303, § 30; 1978, ch. 301, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 308, § 41, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 23, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 185, § 21, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.330.
General duties of mine foreman — Duty of licensee.

The mine foreman shall exercise general supervision over the ventilating apparatus and the airways, traveling ways, working places, pumps and drainage, and shall see that as the miners advance their excavations proper breakthroughs are made as required by law to properly ventilate the mine. He shall see that employees are provided with sufficient props, cap pieces, and timbers of suitable size, which shall be delivered to the working place and shall see that the props are cut as square as practicable at both ends and as near as practicable to the proper length required or designated for the places where they are to be used. The mine foreman shall see that the water is drained as nearly as practicable out of the working places, and that the working places are kept as free from water as practicable during working hours. He shall see that every person employed to work in the mine is, before beginning to work, instructed in the particular danger incident to his work in the mine and furnished a copy of the rules of the mine. He shall immediately report all violations of the mining laws to the operator or superintendent, who shall report the violations to the mine inspector.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 31.

352.340.
Examination of mine by mine foreman or assistants — Removal of dangers — Record.

The mine foreman or his assistants shall:

Visit and carefully examine each working place in the mine at least every four (4) hours while the mine employees are at work;

Examine as live workings, on regular inspections, all places in live sections that are temporarily abandoned. If the mine foreman finds any place to be in a dangerous condition, he shall not leave the place until it is made safe, or until the employees working therein are removed until the place is made safe;

Ensure that every mine liberating explosive gas is kept free of standing gas in all working places and roadways, and that all accumulations of explosive or noxious gases in the worked-out or abandoned portions of any mine are removed as soon as possible after discovery;

Ensure that all preshift examinations are conducted by a certified person, that examinations of conveyor belts have been conducted, and that no person who may be endangered by the presence of explosive or noxious gases be allowed to enter that portion of the mine until the gases have been removed; and

Direct and see that all dangerous places and the entrances to worked-out and abandoned places in all mines are properly barricaded across the openings, so that no person will enter, and that danger signs are posted upon the barricade to warn persons of existing danger. The mine foreman or his or her assistants shall give prompt attention to the removal of all dangers reported to him by his assistants, the fire boss, or any person working in the mine, and if it is impracticable to remove the danger at once, the mine foreman or his or her assistants shall notify every person whose safety is menaced thereby to remain away from the portion where the dangerous condition exists.

The mine foreman or his assistants, fire bosses, or other certified persons shall, at least once every week, travel and examine all air courses, escapeways, the caches of self-contained self-rescuer devices required by KRS

352.133

, the caches’ contents, seals on the return, roads, and openings that give access to old workings or pillar falls, and make a record of the condition of all places where danger has been found. The record shall be made with ink pencil in the record book provided for that purpose.

Examinations of conveyor belts shall be conducted by a certified foreman or a certified belt examiner. A certified belt examiner shall have a total of three (3) years of practical underground mining experience and successfully complete a certification examination administered by the Division of Mine Safety. The certification examination shall cover the topics of belt conveyor legal requirements; roof control practices; mine ventilation; mine gases and instruments; fire hazards; and inspection and reporting procedures. The belt examiner also shall demonstrate proficiency in the use of an anemometer, methane detector, and oxygen devices.

HISTORY:

2739-42: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 32; 1996, ch. 308, § 42, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 185, § 22, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 87, § 34, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2000). The phrase “with ink pencil” in the last sentence of subsection (2) of this statute appears to have resulted from a drafting error. In 2000 Ky. Acts ch. 104, secs. 21 and 25, the words “or indelible pencil” were deleted from the phrase “with ink or indelible pencil.” In Section 24 of that Act, however, only the words “or indelible” were deleted from the same phrase that appeared in this statute.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.350.
Mine foreman to notify licensee or superintendent of dangers — Duties as to reports — Compliance with inspector’s recommendations.

The mine foreman shall notify, in writing, the licensee or superintendent of the mine of his inability to comply with any of the requirements of the mining laws, and the licensee or superintendent shall at once attend to the matter complained of by the mine foreman so as to enable him to comply with the mining laws.

The mine foreman shall each day enter and sign plainly with ink, in a book provided for that purpose, a report of the condition of the mine. The report shall clearly state any danger that comes under his observation during the day or is reported to him by his assistants or by the fire bosses, and shall state what action was taken to correct such danger, whether or not there is a proper supply of material on hand for the safe working of the mine, and whether or not the mining laws are being complied with. The mine foreman shall each day read carefully, and countersign with ink, all reports entered in the record book of the fire bosses.

The mine superintendent, mine manager, mine foreman, and assistant foreman shall be held jointly responsible for the immediate compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 32; 1976, ch. 174, § 18; 2000, ch. 104, § 25, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 185, § 23, effective July 12, 2006.

352.360.
Duty of mine foreman as to breakthroughs, measurement of air current, designation of escapeways, and installation of man doors.

The mine foreman shall see that breakthroughs are made as required by law, and shall see that ventilation is conducted by means of the breakthroughs and through the rooms by means of check doors or curtains placed on the entries or other suitable places, and shall not permit any room to be opened in advance of the ventilating current.

At least once each week while the mine is in operation the mine foreman, or some certified person designated by the mine foreman, with an anemometer furnished by the licensee, shall measure the air current at the inlet and outlet and at or near the faces of the advanced headings, and shall keep a record of the measurements in a book approved by the commissioner for the purpose.

The mine foreman shall see that signboards directing the way to outlets or escapeways are conspicuously placed throughout the mine.

Hinged man doors, installed after June 16, 1976, shall be at least thirty (30) inches square or the height of the coal seam, and shall be installed on the intake and the return air course at intervals not to exceed three hundred (300) feet when the height of the coal is below forty-eight (48) inches and at intervals not to exceed five hundred (500) feet when the height of the coal is above forty-eight (48) inches.

Where it is necessary to cross a conveyer belt to reach an escapeway man door, unless another safe means is provided, there shall be a stop-start switch controlling the conveyer belt. The switch shall be located in such a manner that it may be reached from each side of the belt.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 33; 1972, ch. 303, § 33; 1976, ch. 174, § 19; 1996, ch. 308, § 43, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.370.
Boreholes in advance of face, when required. [Repealed.]

352.371.
Boreholes in advance of working face required.

Whenever any working place approaches within fifty (50) feet of abandoned areas in the mine as shown by surveys made and certified by a registered engineer, or within two hundred (200) feet of any other abandoned areas of the mine which cannot be inspected and which may contain dangerous accumulations of water or gas, or within two hundred (200) feet of any workings of an adjacent mine, a borehole or boreholes shall be drilled to a distance of at least twenty (20) feet in advance of the working face of the working place and shall be continually maintained to a distance of at least ten (10) feet in advance of the advancing working face. When there is more than one (1) borehole, they shall be drilled sufficiently close to each other to insure that the advancing working face will not accidentally hole through into abandoned areas or adjacent mines. Boreholes shall also be drilled not more than eight (8) feet apart in the rib of the working place to a distance of at least twenty (20) feet and at an angle of forty-five (45) degrees before additional cuts are taken. Rib holes shall be drilled in one (1) or both ribs of the working place as may be necessary for adequate protection of miners in such place. Alternative plans which afford equal or greater protection may be approved by the commissioner or his authorized representative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 34; 1996, ch. 308, § 44, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 19, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.380.
Death or resignation of mine foreman.

In case of the death or resignation of a mine foreman, the superintendent shall select a competent certified man, if one (1) is available, and if not, he may temporarily select any other competent man who, if approved by the mine inspector and the commissioner, may serve until the next examination. He shall, while acting as mine foreman, have the same duties and be liable to the same penalties.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 35.

352.390.
Revocation of certificates — Procedure.

The Mine Safety Review Commission shall revoke, suspend, or probate certificates if it is established in the judgment of the commission that the holder has become unworthy to hold the certificate by reason of violation of law, intemperate habits, failure to maintain drug- and alcohol-free condition of certification, incapacity, abuse of authority, failure to comply with the mining laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or for other just cause. The same procedure provided in subsections (11) and (12) of KRS

351.102

shall apply to the certificate holder.

History.

2739-42: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 36; 1976, ch. 174, § 20; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 12; 1978, ch. 301, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 335, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 149, § 12, effective March 20, 2001; 2006, ch. 241, § 22, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(3/19/93) Although the phrase “ . . . . .
wilful failure to comply with instructions of the mine inspector to obey the mining laws,
. . . . . ” that appeared in the first sentence of this statute prior to the 1976 Regular Session of the General Assembly was changed by action at that session to read “ . . . . .
failure to comply with the mining laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky
. . . . . ”,
see
1976 Ky. Acts ch. 174, sec. 20, the text of the statute amended at 1976 (Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 12, and later at 1978 Ky. Acts ch. 301, sec. 11, failed to incorporate this change. After first correctly printing the text as amended at the 1976 Regular Session, both publishers of the official editions unintentionally returned to part or all of the pre-1976 text by relying on the erroneous unamended text shown in the two later amendments to the statute. The publishers have been directed to alter the text of the first sentence of this statute in order to restore the relevant legislative action from the 1976 Regular Session that was inadvertently omitted in subsequent reprintings of this statute.

See

KRS

446.270

&

446.280

,

enacted

1982 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 3 & 4 (effect of failure to underline new language and failure to indicate deleted material by brackets and strike through in amended statutes);

see also Corson v. Thomson,

116 N.H. 344, 358 A.2d 866 (1976).

352.400.
Mine rules.

The licensee of any mine may adopt special rules consistent with KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter for the government and operation of his mine, and covering all the work pertaining thereto in and out of the mine. Before the rules are put into effect they shall be approved in writing by the commissioner.

The mine rules shall be printed in a form prescribed by the commissioner.

The licensee shall furnish each employee a copy of the mine rules, and each employee shall sign a statement indicating his receipt of a copy of the rules and his agreement to comply with them.

The mine rules shall be included in the subjects taught during annual retraining of the mine’s employees.

History.

2739-54: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 174, § 21; 1996, ch. 308, § 45, effective April 9, 1996; 2000, ch. 104, § 26, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 355, § 20, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.410.
Duties of mine superintendent, mine manager, and licensee.

Each superintendent or mine manager shall, on behalf and at the expense of the licensee, keep on hand at or within convenient distance of the mine, not to exceed five hundred (500) feet, a sufficient quantity of all materials and supplies required to preserve the safety of employees, as ordered by the mine foreman and required by law. If the superintendent or mine manager cannot procure the necessary materials or supplies, he shall at once notify the mine foreman, who shall withdraw the men from the mine until the materials or supplies are received.

The superintendent or mine manager shall, at least once each week, read and examine carefully and countersign all reports entered in the mine record book of the mine foreman.

The licensee, superintendent, or mine manager shall cooperate with the mine foreman and other officials in the fulfillment of their duties under KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter, and shall direct that the mine foreman and all other employees under him comply with the law, especially when his attention is called by the mine inspector or by the commissioner to any violations of the laws.

The superintendent or mine manager shall keep on hand at the mine a supply of printed rules, notices, and record books required by this chapter. The superintendent or mine manager shall see that rules, notices, and record books are delivered to the proper persons at the mine and are properly cared for, and that the rules and notices are posted in conspicuous places at or near the entrance to the mine and kept legible.

History.

2739-50: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 37; 1976, ch. 174, § 22; 2000, ch. 104, § 27, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 355, § 21, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 24, effective July 12, 2006.

352.420.
Required notice to commissioner.

The operator, superintendent, or mine manager of each mine shall give the commissioner at least ten (10) days’ notice of the following:

Abandonment of a mine;

Resumption of work in a mine after an abandonment or discontinuance for a period of two (2) weeks or more; and

Change in the operator or name of a mine.

Each mine shall be inspected and approved by the department before operations are resumed after an abandonment.

History.

2739-50: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 174, § 23; 1994, ch. 488, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 324, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 22, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 25, effective July 12, 2006.

352.430.
Inspection and closing of mines by department — Hearings.

The operator, superintendent, or mine manager of every mine shall furnish the mine inspector proper facilities for entering the mine and making examinations or obtaining information.

If any inspector discovers that any mine does not conform to the provisions of KRS Chapter 351 and this chapter in respect to the safety of employees, or that by reason of any defect or practice not specifically covered by these chapters in or about the mine, the lives or health of persons employed therein are endangered, he shall immediately issue an emergency order to the licensee or superintendent. If he deems it necessary for the immediate protection from imminent danger of bodily harm of the persons employed in the mine, he shall withdraw the men who may be endangered according to the following procedures:

If the entire mine is affected by the dangerous condition, all men shall be withdrawn and production shall be halted until all defects causing the imminently dangerous condition are corrected;

If an imminent danger affects only a portion of the mine, the persons whose safety may be menaced thereby shall be withdrawn from the affected part of the mine and production halted in that area until the dangerous condition is corrected;

Where production is necessary to correct the unsafe condition, it shall be permitted to that extent, using only the necessary personnel; and

Production at the affected area of a mine from which men are withdrawn pursuant to this section may be resumed upon reinspection by a mine inspector and a finding by that inspector that the mine is no longer imminently unsafe.

In all emergency hearings, a departmental attorney, the Attorney General, the Commonwealth’s attorney, or the county attorney of the judicial circuit or county in which the mine is situated shall appear for the Commonwealth and defend the action.

History.

2739-25: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 35; 1972, ch. 303, § 38; 1976, ch. 62, § 122; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 280; 1978, ch. 301, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 336, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 104, § 28, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 185, § 26, effective July 12, 2006.

352.440.
Appeal by miners from inspection by mine inspector.

If seventy-five percent (75%) of the employees of any mine are dissatisfied with the inspection of the mine made by a mine inspector, they may appeal in writing to the department, setting forth clearly and in detail the reasons for their dissatisfaction. The commissioner of the department shall carefully consider the appeal and promptly take action by ordering another inspection to be made by the mine inspector, either alone or in company with another mine inspector detailed by the commissioner for the purpose, if that course appears to him to be warranted by the facts set forth in the appeal, or the commissioner may take such other action as appears to him just and proper. The appeal shall be signed by the dissatisfied persons.

History.

2738-3: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 39.

352.450.
Map of mine to be filed initially and annually — Additional maps.

The operator or superintendent of each underground mine shall annually make or cause to be made a map of the workings of the mine which is accurate and of professional quality, on a scale of not less than one hundred (100) and not more than five hundred (500) feet to the inch, showing the area mined and the forms of the excavations up to January 1, together with the location and connection of the property and mineral lease lines of all adjoining lands within one thousand (1,000) feet of the excavations and, marked on each tract, the name of each owner or lessee of adjoining lands and of mine property for which the map is being filed. Such map shall also show:

The proposed general plan of mining for the next twelve (12) months;

All pillared, worked-out, and abandoned areas;

Entries and aircourses with the direction of airflow indicated by arrows;

Dip of the coal bed;

Escapeways;

Major roof falls;

Any worked-out areas within one thousand (1,000) feet of the projections proposed for the next twelve (12) months, designating whether active, abandoned, or pillared, and showing precautions to be taken if mines are projected towards old workings which cannot be examined;

Mines above or below;

Water pools above;

Location of all known oil and gas wells, both producing and abandoned, within the area required to be mapped, as well as owners and well numbers when possible;

Such map shall identify those areas of the mine which are inaccessible or cannot be entered safely and on which no information is available;

The name and address of the mine, the mine number, seam, and seam thickness;

The scale and orientation of the map, longitude and latitude, and corresponding USGS 7.5 minute quadrangle map;

The property or boundary lines of the mine, indicating the twenty-five (25) foot barrier required by KRS

352.490

between projections and property lines;

All known drill holes that penetrate the coal bed being mined;

All shaft, slope, drift, and tunnel openings and auger and strip-mined areas of the coal bed being mined;

The location of all surface mine ventilation fans; the location may be designated on the mine map by symbols;

The location of railroad tracks and public highways leading to the mine, and mine buildings of a permanent nature with identifying names shown, and watersheds near openings of the mine;

The location and description of at least two (2) permanent base line points coordinated with the underground and surface mine traverses, and the location and description of at least two (2) permanent elevation bench marks used in connection with establishing or referencing mine elevation surveys, and any other identifying permanent landmarks;

The location and elevation of any body of water dammed in the mine or held back in any portion of the mine; provided, however, such bodies of water may be shown on overlays or tracings attached to the mine maps used to show contour lines;

The elevations of tops and bottoms of shafts and slopes, and the floor at the entrance to drift and tunnel openings;

The elevation of the floor at intervals of not more than two hundred (200) feet in:

At least one (1) entry of each working section, main entry, and cross entries;

The last line of open crosscuts of each working section, and main and cross entries before such sections and main and cross entries are abandoned; and

Rooms advancing toward or adjacent to property or boundary lines or adjacent mines; and

Contour lines passing through whole number elevations of the coal bed being mined. The spacing of such lines shall not exceed ten (10) foot elevation levels, except that a broader spacing of contour lines may be approved by the commissioner or his authorized representative for steeply pitching coal beds. Contour lines may be placed on overlays or tracings attached to mine maps.

The operator, superintendent, or mine manager shall deposit a true copy of the map with his license application to the commissioner within forty-five (45) days after January 1, and another copy of the map shall be kept at the office of the mine. A copy shall also be furnished the district office of the department.

After making and filing the map with the commissioner, the operator, superintendent, or mine manager thereafter is only required to file annually with the commissioner, within the time specified, such additional map and statement as is necessary to show the progress of the workings, the amount and forms of excavations, and the property lines within one thousand (1,000) feet of the excavations extended since the date of the preceding map. The commissioner shall annually, before January 1, give notice that the map is required.

The commissioner may require any operator, superintendent, or mine manager to furnish a map other than those required in subsections (1) and (2) of this section or of a surface mine, and the operator or superintendent shall immediately comply with the requirement.

The mine inspector shall have the authority to stop production at the mine of any operator who does not furnish within thirty (30) days of notification of specific deficiencies a map which fully complies with the requirements of this section.

History.

2739-43: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 40; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 28; 2002, ch. 355, § 23, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 27, effective July 12, 2006.

352.460.
Procedure when no map filed or map incorrect.

If the operator, superintendent, or mine manager of any mine fails to furnish to the commissioner any map required by KRS

352.450

and

352.480

, the commissioner may cause a correct survey and map of the mine or extensions thereof to be made at the expense of the owner, lessee, or operator of the mine, and the cost of the map shall be recoverable from the owner, lessee, or operator in the same manner as debts are recoverable by law.

If at any time the commissioner has reason to believe that any map furnished under KRS

352.450

and

352.480

is materially incorrect, so that it will not serve the purpose for which it was intended, he may have a survey and map made or corrected, and the expense of making the survey, map, or correction shall be paid by the owner, lessee, or operator of the mine, or recovered in the same manner as debts are recoverable by law; but if the map furnished by the operator or superintendent is found to be correct, the expense of the survey and drafting of the map shall be paid by the Commonwealth.

History.

2739-43: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 41; 2000, ch. 104, § 29, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 185, § 28, effective July 12, 2006.

352.470.
Certification of map.

The correctness of each map provided for by KRS

352.450

or

352.460

shall be certified only by a professional engineer or land surveyor registered in Kentucky. KRS

322.290

requires registrants to practice only in areas of competence. The certification shall read as follows:

The commissioner may reject any map as incomplete if its accuracy is not so attested.

“I, the undersigned, hereby certify that, to the best of my knowledge and belief, this map is correct, and that all the information required by the mining laws of this Commonwealth is set out within, and covers the period ending, Certifying Agent “Acknowledged before me, a , this day of SEAL”

Click to view

History.

2739-43: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 36; 1972, ch. 303, § 42; 1992, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 419, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 104, § 30, effective July 14, 2000.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under this section the engineers certificate must be acknowledged before a notary public or before another officer authorized to take acknowledgments.

OAG 68-76

.

352.480.
Duplicate maps — Survey of abandoned or closed mine.

The commissioner shall, upon the application therefor in written form by any person, make or cause to be made, at the expense of the applicant, a duplicate of any final or abandoned mine map on file with the department. The department also may make public or divulge any portion of a mine map submitted to the department by a licensee or operator.

When any underground mine is worked out or is about to be abandoned or indefinitely closed, the licensee shall make or cause to be made a final map of the mine, to show the entire worked-out area at the time the mine was abandoned or closed. A certified copy of the final map of the mine, on a scale of not less than one hundred (100) and not more than five hundred (500) feet to the inch, shall be filed with the commissioner.

History.

2739-43: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 43; 1998, ch. 480, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 355, § 24, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 87, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

352.490.
Mine not to extend within twenty-five feet of property line — Liability for damages.

No owner or tenant of any land containing coal shall engage in underground mining within twenty-five (25) feet of the line dividing the mineral owned or held by him from that of another person, without the written consent of every person interested in or having title to the adjoining land in possession, reversion, or remainder, or the guardians of such of those persons as are infants. The owner or tenant must also have the approval of the commissioner.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section is liable for damages to the persons injured who may pursue for remedies provided by law for the recovery of damages for injury to their property.

History.

2739-51: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 37; 1972, ch. 303, § 44; 1996, ch. 308, § 47, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.